Hawaii statutes.
[§15D-5] Overseas voter's
registration address. In registering to vote, an overseas voter who is eligible
to vote in this State shall use and be assigned to the voting district of the person's
residence, or the last place of residence prior to leaving this State, or, in
the case of a voter described by paragraph (4) of the definition of
"covered voter" under section 15D-2, the address of the last place of
residence in this State of the parent or legal guardian of the voter. If that
address is no longer a recognized residential address, the voter shall be
assigned a district for voting purposes. [L 2012, c 226, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next